Louisiana, session 2026, HB386.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:3995(A)(1)(introductory paragraph) and (4)(a)(ii), (H), and (I) are
hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 17:3995(L) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§3995. Charter school funding
A.(1) For the purpose of funding, a Type 1 charter school, Type 3 charter
school, Type 3B charter school not acting as its own local education agency, and
Type 4 charter school shall be considered an approved public school of the local
school board entering into the charter agreement.; however, a Type 1 charter school,
Type 3 charter school, or Type 3B charter school, subject to the approval of the local
school board and in accordance with rules the local school board adopts for such
purpose, may be considered the local education agency for federal funding purposes
and statutory definitions, Type 2 charter schools and a Type 3B charter school acting
as its own local education agency shall receive a per pupil amount each year
authorized by the state board each year as provided in the approved minimum
foundation program formula. The per pupil amount provided to a Type 1, 2, 3, 3B,
or 4 charter school shall be computed annually and shall be equal to the per pupil
amount provided through the minimum foundation program formula, determined by
the allocation weights in the formula based upon student characteristics or needs,
received by the school district in which the student resides from the following
sources based on the district's membership count used in the minimum foundation
program formula:
* * *
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 386 ENROLLED
(4)(a)
* * *
(ii) The state Department of Education may withhold and retain from state
funds otherwise allocated to a local public school system through the minimum
foundation program formula an amount equal to one quarter of one percent of the fee
amount charged to a Type 3B charter school acting as its own local education agency
pursuant to Item (i) of this Subparagraph, or a Type 1, 3, or 4 charter school acting
as its own education agency pursuant to R.S. 17:10.7.1 or as provided in Paragraph
(1) of this Subsection, for administrative costs incurred by the department for
providing financial oversight and monitoring of such charter schools.
* * *
H.(1) Any Type 2 or 5 charter school shall be considered the local education
agency for funding purposes and statutory definitions pursuant to rules adopted by
the state board.
(2) With the approval of the local school board, a Type 1 charter school,
Type 3 charter school, or Type 3B charter school may be considered the local
education agency for federal funding purposes and statutory definitions in
accordance with rules adopted by the local school board.
I. The local school board shall remain the local education agency for any
Type 1, 3, or 4 charter school, unless the charter school is authorized to act as its own
local education agency, pursuant to R.S. 17:10.7.1 or as provided in Paragraph
(A)(1) of this Section.
* * *
L. The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall promulgate
rules in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act regarding a Type 1 charter
school, Type 3 charter school, or a Type 3B charter school that is acting as its own
local education agency. Such rule shall do all of the following:
(1) Delineate the financial and programmatic obligations of the charter school
as related to the receipt of federal funds.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 386 ENROLLED
(2) Authorize the state superintendent of education to rescind a charter
school's authority to act as its own local education agency if the school fails to meet
the financial and programmatic obligations established by the state board.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.